Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4310
(UDTA 10) Duty to provide information to trust director or trustee.

(UDTA 10) (a) Subject to section 30-4311, a trustee shall provide information to a trust director to the extent the information is reasonably related both to:

(1) the powers or duties of the trustee; and

(2) the powers or duties of the director.

(b) Subject to section 30-4311, a trust director shall provide information to a trustee or another trust director to the extent the information is reasonably related both to:

(1) the powers or duties of the director; and

(2) the powers or duties of the trustee or other director.

(c) A trustee that acts in reliance on information provided by a trust director is not liable for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance, unless by so acting the trustee engages in willful misconduct.

(d) A trust director that acts in reliance on information provided by a trustee or another trust director is not liable for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance, unless by so acting the trust director engages in willful misconduct.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 10.